Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Flood Control Agreements with United States.

§ 51-35-1.
Drainage district agreements to maintain works.

The commissioners of any drainage district heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, acting on behalf of the district or in cooperation with other drainage districts, are hereby authorized and empowered to give satisfactory assurances to the United States of America or any agency thereof that any and all flood control works, constructed either within or without the district by the United States of America or any agency thereof, shall be maintained without expense to the United States. The commissioners of any drainage district are hereby authorized and empowered on behalf of the district to enter into agreements with the commissioners of other drainage districts for carrying out the purposes of Sections 51-35-1 through 51-35-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4763; Laws, 1936, ch. 325.

§ 51-35-3.
Relocation of roads outside drainage district.

The commissioners of any drainage district agreeing as herein provided to maintain flood control works constructed by the United States of America or any agency thereof are hereby authorized and empowered to appropriate money and to pay the same to the proper state, county, or district authority as reimbursement for the cost of locating, relocating, building, or rebuilding of any roads and highways outside the limits of the district, when the same shall be rendered necessary by the construction of flood control works, and to give satisfactory assurances to the United States of America or any agency thereof that the location, relocation, building, or rebuilding of such roads and highways shall be done without expense to the United States of America.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4764; Laws, 1936, ch. 325.

§ 51-35-5.
Donations of land to drainage district.

The commissioners of any drainage district entering into agreement with the United States of America or any agency thereof, as hereinbefore provided, are hereby authorized and empowered to accept for the district the conveyance of any lands, within or without the district, and to use, rent, lease, and convey the same for the benefit of the district in the maintenance of flood control works and improvements. Such lands when vested in the district shall be subject to taxation as are other lands, and said commissioners are hereby authorized and empowered to pay such taxes out of any available funds other than sinking funds being accumulated for the retirement of district bonds and payment of interest thereon; and such drainage districts are hereby authorized and empowered to pay such taxes out of any available fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4765; Laws, 1936, ch. 325; Laws, 1938, ch. 259.

§ 51-35-7.
Drainage district tax for maintenance.

The commissioners of any drainage districts entering into such agreements as are herein provided are authorized and empowered to fix and levy an annual ad valorem tax of not exceeding two mills on the dollar upon all of the real and personal property in the district, for the purpose of defraying the costs of maintenance of flood control works and the costs of location, relocation, building, and rebuilding of roads and highways without the limits of the district. Such levy shall be certified by the commissioners to the board of supervisors of the proper county before the time fixed by law for the levying of county taxes; and the board of supervisors shall, at the time fixed for the levying of county taxes, levy such tax and certify said levy to the tax collector, who shall collect such taxes as other taxes of the county are collected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4766; Laws, 1936, ch. 325.

§ 51-35-9.
Drainage district agreements to furnish rights of way.

The commissioners of any drainage district heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, acting on behalf of the district or in cooperation with other drainage districts, are hereby authorized and empowered to give satisfactory assurances to the chief of engineers of the United States Army, to the Mississippi River Commission, to the United States district engineer, or to any other agency of the United States government that they will furnish rights of way for all levees and drainage ditches within or without the district for any and all flood control works, including levees and ditches constructed by the United States of America or any agency thereof, within or without the district. The commissioners of any drainage district are hereby authorized and empowered on behalf of the district to enter into agreements with the commissioners of any other drainage districts for carrying out the purposes of Sections 51-35-9 through 51-35-13.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4766-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 181, § 1.

§ 51-35-11.
Acquisition of rights of way by drainage districts.

The commissioners of any drainage district agreeing as herein provided to furnish rights of way for levees and drainage ditches for flood control work constructed by the United States of America, or any agency thereof, are hereby authorized and empowered to acquire or condemn rights of way for levees and drainage ditches inside and outside of the district in the same manner as the commissioners are now authorized to acquire or condemn rights of way and easements for the construction of other drainage works within the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4766-02; Laws, 1946, ch. 181, § 2.

§ 51-35-13.
Drainage district tax for rights of way.

The commissioners of any drainage district entering into such agreements as are herein provided are hereby authorized and empowered to fix and levy an annual ad valorem tax of not exceeding two mills on the dollar upon all of the real and personal property in the district, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of acquiring or condemning and furnishing rights of way for levees and drainage ditches within or without the limits of the district. Such levy shall be certified by the commissioners to the board of supervisors of the proper county before the time fixed by law for the levying of county taxes; and the board of supervisors shall, at the time fixed by law for the levying of county taxes, levy such tax and certify said levy to the tax collector, who shall collect such taxes as other taxes of the county are collected.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4766-03; Laws, 1946, ch. 181, § 3.

§ 51-35-15.
County agreements for rights of way and maintenance.

The board of supervisors of any county through any part of which any river or other stream may run, or any part of which any river or other stream may touch or border, on which the United States of America has authorized flood control improvements, including channel clearing, channel improvement, cut-offs, levees, dams, or other flood control improvements, is hereby authorized and empowered, for that part of such river or stream running through any part of said county or bordering or touching said county, as aforesaid, to give satisfactory assurances to the United States of America or any agency thereof including the Secretary of War, that it will:

Provide, without cost to the United States, all lands, easements, and rights of way necessary for the construction of the project;

Hold and save the United States free from damages due to the construction of the works; and

Maintain and operate all of the works after completion in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Secretary of War, under the terms of the Flood Control Act of June 22, 1936, or any other similar Flood Control Act of the United States.

Any such board of supervisors is also hereby authorized and empowered to accept the conveyance of any lands, easements, and rights of way over and on behalf of any lands that may be benefited by the maintenance of such works; to accept assurances from landowners whose property is benefited by such flood control improvements, to levy, assess, and collect such taxes on said area so benefited as will be necessary; to save and hold the United States free from all damages due to the construction of the works; to exercise the right of eminent domain for the condemnation of rights of way and easements in like manner as is exercised by boards of supervisors for the condemnation of public road rights of way; to maintain such works in said county after completion, and generally to accept agreements for landowners benefited by such flood works to save the county harmless on account of said assurances given by the county as aforesaid to the United States of America or any agency thereof, including the Secretary of War.

This section shall apply to any county lying wholly within a levee district, or to that part of a county lying within a levee district.

This section shall not apply to any county in which a reservoir project, as a part of a United States government flood control program, shall have been begun prior to the first day of January, 1938.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4767; Laws, 1938, ch. 314.

§ 51-35-17.
Agreement by certain county.

The board of supervisors of any county in which is located a national park, a national cemetery, and which is located on the Mississippi River and through any part of which any river or other stream may run, or any part of which any river or other stream may touch or border, on which the United States of America has authorized or may hereafter authorize navigation or flood control improvements is hereby authorized and empowered to give satisfactory assurances to the United States of America, or any agency thereof, that it will:

Provide, without cost to the United States, all lands, easements, and rights of way necessary for the construction of the project;

Hold and save the United States free from damages due to the construction works;

Maintain and operate all of the works after completion in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Secretary of the Army; and

Acquire such added area as may be necessary for the public benefit and use in accordance with the requirements of the United States, or any agency thereof, in connection with any such project.

Any such board of supervisors is also hereby authorized and empowered to accept the conveyance of any lands, easements, and rights of way over and on behalf of any lands that may be benefited by the maintenance of such works; to accept assurances from landowners whose property is benefited by such flood control improvements; to levy, assess, and collect such taxes on said area so benefited as will be necessary; to save and hold the United States free from all damages due to the construction of the works; to exercise the right of eminent domain for the condemnation of rights of way and easements in like manner as is exercised by board of supervisors for the condemnation of public road rights of way; to maintain such works in said county after completion; and generally to accept agreements for landowners benefited by such flood works to save the county harmless on account of said assurances given by the county as aforesaid to the United States of America, or any agency thereof. Any such board of supervisors may exercise all of the powers granted by virtue of Section 59-7-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, in connection with the fulfillment of any of the aforementioned assurances.

In addition to levying, assessing, and collecting such taxes on the area directly so benefited, the board of supervisors of such county may, if deemed necessary to fairly bear or supplement the cost of the providing of all necessary lands, easements, and rights of way for the construction of the project and maintaining and operating the works after completion, levy a countywide tax for such purposes; but such countywide tax shall not be levied, assessed, or collected until after such board of supervisors shall have published notice for three weeks to the taxpayers of said county of its intention so to do, of the maximum rate of said tax, and of the year or numbers of years, not exceeding five years, in which it is then intended to levy and assess such tax, including the maximum rate proposed for each projected year, in some newspaper published in said county and having a general circulation therein. Unless 20% of the qualified electors of said county shall protest against such assessments at a time to be fixed by the board, at least 10 days and not more than 20 days from the date of the last publication, then the authority of such board to levy, assess, and collect such taxes shall exist, but not to exceed the maximum millage rate specified according to the advertisement. Should 20% of the qualified electors protest against such levies, taxes, or assessments, then a special election shall be called for the purpose of presenting such issue to the qualified voters of such county, and the right to make such county-wide levies and assessments and to collect said taxes shall not exist unless authorized at such special election by a majority of the qualified electors actually voting in such election.

Should the voters of such county protest against and, at the special election, disapprove such countywide assessments, then the issue of such countywide assessments and levies shall not be reconsidered by the board of supervisors of such county and again presented until the lapse of at least one year from the date that such countywide tax was disapproved at the special election called for that purpose. Upon the expiration of each period specified in the notice of intention to levy and collect such countywide taxes for the purposes herein authorized, the board of supervisors of any such county may continue to levy and collect such taxes upon first again following the procedure in this section outlined.

This section shall not serve to repeal Section 51-35-15, but is in amplification and extension of the authority and powers therein granted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4767.3; Laws, 1948, ch. 358, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1968, ch. 300, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved July 11, 1968).

§ 51-35-19.
Alteration, relocation, or abandonment of county roadways.

The authority granted to boards of supervisors under Section 170 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi shall be construed to include the right to enter into agreements with the United States for the alteration, relocation, reconstruction, or abandonment of county roadways and the conveyance of easements for term of years, perpetual easements, or fee simple title to the portions of county roadways affected by the construction of flood control projects approved and adopted by the United States or any agency thereof.

Such agreements shall be based upon a consideration deemed reasonable by the board of supervisors and the government.

Any such alteration, relocation, or abandonment of county roadways shall be made pursuant to the authority and procedure of law now in force and effect.

The conveyance of the necessary interest in any such county road right of way shall be for and on behalf of the county and executed by the then acting president of the board, attested by the clerk, and under proper resolution. Such conveyance may include a clause releasing the United States from any further claim as to the county on account of the construction of such flood control project and alteration, relocation, reconstruction, or abandonment of a county roadway or any portion thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4767.5; Laws, 1944, ch. 205, §§ 1-4.

§ 51-35-21.
Contribution to cost of acquiring land for improvements outside county.

The board of supervisors of any county through any part of which any river or other stream may run, or any part of which any river or stream may touch or border, on which the United States of America or any agency thereof has authorized flood control improvements, including channel clearing, channel improvement, cut-offs, levees, dams or other flood control improvements, when any of the lands of said county will be benefited by flood control improvements so authorized by the United States of America or any agency thereof to be constructed or made outside the border of such county, is hereby authorized and empowered to contribute to the cost of acquisition of land, easements and rights-of-way necessary for the construction of such flood control improvements outside the border of such county, provided such contribution shall be made to that county, flood control district or other agency authorized by law to acquire lands, easements or rights-of-way for such improvements, which acquires the same pursuant to request therefor from the United States of America. However, this authority to purchase lands shall allow only purchase of lands in counties lying wholly or partly within a levee district.

Said board of supervisors is hereby authorized:

To expend for such purposes not to exceed the sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) from the county general fund, whether or not the expenditure thereof be in excess of the budget for the fiscal year adopted by such board;

To fix and levy annually for such purposes, in addition to any tax that such boards are now authorized by law to levy and in excess of the limitations now provided by law for the levying of taxes by such boards, an ad valorem tax on all the lands and property in the county, not to exceed three (3) mills on the dollar on the assessed valuation on all real and personal property in the county, including railroads; and

To borrow funds not in excess of Ten Thousand Dollars ($ 10,000.00) at interest rates not to exceed five percent (5%) per annum and to issue bonds for such purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4767.7; Laws, 1950, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 39, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 51-35-23.
Apportionment of federal funds.

All moneys paid to the State of Mississippi by the United States on account of leases of flood control lands under the provisions of the Flood Control Act, as amended June 28, 1938 (52 U.S. Statutes at Large, page 1221), shall be apportioned by the state treasurer to the several counties in which such flood control lands are located and from which the moneys were received by virtue of the lease of flood control lands, as may be determined by the United States, or department thereof, in settling with the state treasurer under the terms and provisions of the Flood Control Act.

The several sums so apportioned to each county shall be paid over by the state treasurer to the county depository, and fifty per cent (50%) of such funds shall be expended for the benefit of the public schools and fifty per cent (50%) of such funds shall be expended for the benefit of public roads of the county, or counties, in which such flood control lands are situated. Where no schools are located in any affected area entitled to moneys under the provisions of said Flood Control Act, then all of such moneys so apportioned to such affected area may be spent for the benefit of public roads in the area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4768; Laws, 1942, ch. 319; Laws, 1950, ch. 428.

§ 51-35-25.
Authorization for annual fee to be imposed on landowners selling reforestation easements; limitation on amount of fee; proceeds to be used to provide road maintenance; fire and police protection; and other services.

As used in this section:

“Project” means the Yazoo Basin, Yazoo Backwater, Mississippi, Project authorized by the Flood Control Act of 18 August 1941 and the Water Resources Development Act of 1986.

“Project area” means land in Humphreys, Issaquena, Sharkey, Warren, Washington and Yazoo Counties located at or below the one hundred-year frequency flood elevation.

“Reforestation easement” means an easement on open agricultural land located in the project area that restricts the future use of the property to woodlands that is purchased from a landowner by the Corps of Engineers or other governmental entity for purposes specifically related to the project.

The board of supervisors of any county in the project area may, in its discretion, require all landowners in the county who sell reforestation easements in the project area for purposes specifically related to the project to annually pay a fee in an amount not to exceed Four Dollars ($4.00) per acre, on each acre of property for which a landowner sold such an easement. The proceeds of the fee shall be used by the board of supervisors to provide services such as road maintenance, fire protection and police protection, and other services necessary for the maintenance and protection of reforestation easements in the project area. If the federal government provides funds to counties in the project area which may be used by the counties to provide such services necessary for the maintenance and protection of reforestation easements in the project area, the board of supervisors of a county receiving such federal funds shall reduce any fee imposed under this section by a proportionate amount based on the ratio that the amount of federal funds received by the county bears to the cost of providing such services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 528, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).